apertium-tam.tam.twol
Alphabet
    அ ஆ இ ஈ உ ஊ எ ஏ ஐ ஒ ஓ ஔ ஃ க ங ச ஞ	ட ண த ந ப ம ய ர ல வ	ழ ள ற ன
   ா ி  ீ  ு  ூ  ெ  ே  ை  ொ  ோ  ௌ  ௗ   ்
     %{X%}:0 %>:0 %»:0;

Sets

Consonant = க ங ச ஞ	ட ண த ந ப ம ய ர ல வ	ழ ள ற ன ;
Mellinam = ங ஞ ண ந ம ன;
Vallinam = க ச ட த ப ற;
Idaiyinam = ய ர ல வ ழ ள;

RemConsonant = Mellinam ல ;

Vowel = அ ஆ இ ஈ உ ஊ எ ஏ ஐ ஒ ஓ ஔ ஃ ;
VowWithSym = ஆ இ ஈ உ ஊ எ ஏ ஐ ஒ ஓ ஔ ;
VowSym = ா ி  ீ  ு  ூ  ெ  ே  ை  ொ  ோ  ௌ ;
ShortVowSym = ி  ு  ெ  ை  ொ;
LongVowSym =  ா  ீ  ூ  ே  ோ  ௌ;


Rules 

"Change to VowSymbols When Preceded by a Consonant"
Vx:Vy <=> %»: _ ;
          where Vx in VowWithSym Vy in VowSym matched;

"Ending with Vowels"
%{X%}:க <=> LongVowSym: %>: _ ;

"Ending with Mellinam"
%{X%}:ங <=> Mellinam: ்: %>: _ ;

"Ending with ல"
%{X%}:ற <=> ல:  ்: %>: _ ;
              except
               ி: ல:  ்: %>: _ ;
               ோ: ல:  ்: %>: _ ;

"Ending with ல"
%{X%}:ல <=> Vx: ல:  ்: %>: _ ;
              where Vx in ( ி  ோ ) ;

"Removing அ When adding after a consonant"
அ:0 <=> %»: _ ;

"Inserting ய"
%{X%}:ய <=> ை: _ %»:;
             ி: _ %»:;

"Ending with ல"
%{X%}:வ <=>  ா: _ %»:;

"Inserting ல"
%{X%}:ல <=> Vallinam: ல:   ்: _ %»:;
            except 
            ட: ல:   ்: _ %»:;

"Changing to த"
%{X%}:த <=> ம:   ்: _ %»:;

"Changing to த"
ம:த <=> _   ்: %{X%}: %»:;

"Changing to ட"
%{X%}:ட <=> VowSym: ட:  ு: _ %»:;

"Removing  ு"
 ு:Vx <=> VowSym: ட: _ %{X%}: %»:;
          where Vx in (  ் ) ;

"Removing  ு"
 ு:0 <=> வ: _ %{X%}: %»:;
          க: _ %{X%}: %»:;
           ்: ட: _ %{X%}: %»:;

"Adding Kutru"
0:Vy <=> LongVowSym: %>: %{X%}: _ க: ;
         RemConsonant: ்: %>: %{X%}: _ க: ;
         where Vy in (  ் ) ;

"Removing kutru When adding Suffix"
  ்:0 <=> RemConsonant: _ %>: ;
          _ %{X%}: %»:;
          except 
          ப: ல: _ %{X%}: %»:;
          ம: _ %{X%}: %»:;


"Removing Consonant When adding suffix"
Vx:0 <=> _ ்: %>: ;
    where Vx in RemConsonant ;

! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
